Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 5. Assault and Battery
§ 6-2-503.
Child abuse; penalty.

A person who is not responsible for a child’s welfare as defined by W.S. 14-3-202(a)(i), is guilty of child abuse, a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, if:

The actor is an adult or is at least six (6) years older than the victim; and

The actor intentionally or recklessly inflicts upon a child under the age of sixteen (16) years:

Physical injury as defined in W.S. 14-3-202(a)(ii)(B);

Mental injury as defined in W.S. 14-3-202(a)(ii)(A); or

Torture or cruel confinement.

A person is guilty of child abuse, a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, if a person responsible for a child’s welfare as defined in W.S. 14-3-202(a)(i) intentionally or recklessly inflicts upon a child under the age of eighteen (18) years:

Physical injury as defined in W.S. 14-3-202(a)(ii)(B), excluding reasonable corporal punishment;

Mental injury as defined in W.S. 14-3-202(a)(ii)(A); or

Torture or cruel confinement.

Aggravated child abuse is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than twenty-five (25) years if in the course of committing the crime of child abuse, as defined in subsection (a) or (b) of this section, the person intentionally or recklessly inflicts serious bodily injury upon the victim or the person intentionally inflicts substantial mental or emotional injury upon the victim by the torture or cruel confinement of the victim.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, § 2; 1998, ch. 93, § 1; 2009, ch. 41, § 1; 2015 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

For definition of “recklessly,” see §

6-1-104

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “Except under circumstances constituting a violation of W.S.

6-2-502

” at the beginning of (a) and (b); and added (c).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a) and (b), substituted “ten (10)” for “five (5)” in the introductory language and made stylistic changes; added (C) to (a)(ii), and (iii) to (b); added “or the person intentionally inflicts substantial mental or emotional injury upon the victim by the torture or cruel confinement of the victim” at the end of (c).

Intent. —

Child abuse is a crime requiring only general intent, not specific intent. Rowe v. State, 974 P.2d 937,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1999), reh'g denied,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. Mar. 25, 1999).

Applicability to habitual criminal statute. —

The initially imposed sentences following the defendant's conviction for child abuse were illegal as a matter of law given that the habitual criminal statute, §

6-10-201

, applies only to “violent felonies” and that the statutory definition of violent felonies does not include felony child abuse. Rodgriguez v. State, 917 P.2d 172,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. June 11, 1996).

Prosecution for felony murder based on child abuse. —

Defendant's prosecution for felony murder under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-101

, based on his abuse of a child under 16, rather than for child abuse, under this section, did not violate equal protection under Wyo. Const. art. I, §§ 2 or 34, as the provision of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-101

allowing a first degree murder prosecution for child abuse gave fair notice that life imprisonment or execution were possible penalties. Johnson v. State, 2003 WY 9, 61 P.3d 1234,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. Feb. 18, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 841, 124 S. Ct. 108, 157 L. Ed. 2d 74, 2003 U.S. LEXIS 5710 (U.S. 2003).

Although the district court erred by instructing the jury as to common law parental duties that were not encompassed within the charged crime of felony murder based on child abuse, the error was harmless because the completed verdict form showed juror unanimity as to defendant's guilt on all of the theories properly alleged; the judgment and sentence had to be amended to reflect the fact that only one charge was brought, that defendant was bound over and arraigned and pled to only one charge, and that he was therefore convicted of only one charge.
Yellowbear v. State, 2008 WY 4, 174 P.3d 1270,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2008).

Stepfather, prosecuted for child abuse, had standing to contest constitutionality of this section.

Keser v. State, 706 P.2d 263,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1985).

Section not void for vagueness. —

This section, which, prior to the 1984 amendment, stated that “…any adult who intentionally or in reckless disregard of the consequences causes physical injury or mental trauma to a child …,” was not void for vagueness. Keser v. State, 706 P.2d 263,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1985).

Common-law defense of parental discipline was available to one prosecuted under this section. —

Requiring the defendant to prove this defense was not unconstitutional. Keser v. State, 706 P.2d 263,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1985).

Evidence sufficient. —

Evidence was sufficient to support defendants’ convictions for physically abusing the victim because the victim testified that defendant would sometimes use the black belt as punishment if the victim did not complete his chores, the belt would leave bruises on his bottom, back, and legs, and his three siblings testified that both defendants used a backscratcher to beat the victim. Larkins v. State, 2018 WY 122, 429 P.3d 28,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 2018).

Evidence sufficient to uphold conviction. DeWitt v. State, 917 P.2d 1144,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1996).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion by denying a motion for judgment of acquittal because the evidence was sufficient to support a conviction for felony child abuse; defendant used wood to spank the victim, which left abrasions, bruises, and lacerations. Defendant's argument that the injuries were not serious and that he acted reasonably was misplaced; because the State was entitled to all favorable inferences that could have been drawn from the evidence, the jury was free to reject defendant's proffered justifications for the abuse. Swan v. State, 2014 WY 38, 320 P.3d 235,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2014).

Evidence was sufficient for jury to conclude that defendant was an adult, or in any event was at least six years older than his five-year-old victim. Rowe v. State, 974 P.2d 937,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1999), reh'g denied,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. Mar. 25, 1999).

Mental injury.—

Defendants did not dispute at their trial for multiple counts of child abuse that their children suffered mental injury because each of their children was found to have significant deficits in their social and behavioral development and two of their children were diagnosed with attention deficit disorders. Gifford v. State, 2017 WY 93, 399 P.3d 1240,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2017).

Recklessly.—

Considering defendants' repeated failure to accept the remedial parenting advice and services of medical and educational professionals, and the evidence indicating their understanding of their children's needs, there was sufficient evidence to show that defendants acted recklessly through their conscious disregard of a substantial and unjustifiable risk of harm to their children. Gifford v. State, 2017 WY 93, 399 P.3d 1240,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2017).

Jury instruction.—

When defendant was convicted of first-degree felony murder on the underlying offense of aggravated child abuse or child abuse, the denial of defendant’s request for lesser-included offense instructions of criminally negligent homicide and involuntary manslaughter was appropriate because the State of Wyoming had to prove the elements of either child abuse or aggravated child abuse and that the victim’s death occurred during the perpetration of that crime. Criminally negligent homicide and involuntary manslaughter contained different elements. Hartley v. State, 2020 WY 40, 460 P.3d 716,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2020).

In a felony
child abuse case, a district court erred when it failed to instruct
the jury in the elements instruction of the count relating to the
victim that physical injury excluded “reasonable corporal
punishment”;
the error was plain because the instructions
were confusing as to
the burden of proof. However, the State was
entitled to retry defendant
because it presented sufficient evidence
to support a verdict finding
that the victim's physical injuries
due to getting hit in the ribs
and slapped in the face were not the
result of reasonable corporal
punishment. Andersen v. State, 2014 WY 88, 330 P.3d 256,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2014).

Sentence upheld. —

Record amply supported sentencing judge's exercise of discretion in imposing sentence of not less than four nor more than five years. See Smallwood v. State, 771 P.2d 798,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1989).

Expert testimony. —

Trial court did not err in allowing an expert to testify as to child abuse because that term had a medical meaning, as well as a legal meaning. The jury's role was to determine whether the elements in this section were met.
Sanchez v. State, 2006 WY 116, 142 P.3d 1134,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Coleman v. State, 827 P.2d 385,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1992).

Stated

in

In re Adoption of RHA, 702 P.2d 1259,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 516

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Smallwood v. State, 748 P.2d 1141,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1988);
Longfellow v. State, 803 P.2d 848,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1990);
Coleman v. State, 843 P.2d 558,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1992);
Ross v. State, 930 P.2d 965,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1996);
Taylor v. Wyoming Bd. of Medicine, 930 P.2d 973,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1996);
King v. State, 2002 WY 27, 40 P.3d 700,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2002);
Sarr v. State, 2007 WY 140, 166 P.3d 891,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Aug. 29, 2007);
Kruger v. State, 2012 WY 2, 268 P.3d 248,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Jan. 5, 2012);
Scott v. State, 2012 WY 86, 278 P.3d 747,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(June 18, 2012); Rhodes v. State, 2015 WY 60,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Apr. 27, 2015); State v. Bridger,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. June 17, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Fetal Equality?: The Equality State's Response to the Challenge of Protecting Unborn Children,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 193 (1997).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Failure of state or local government entity to protect child abuse victim as violation of federal constitutional right, 79 ALR Fed 514.

§ 6-2-504.
Reckless endangering; penalty.

A person is guilty of reckless endangering if he recklessly engages in conduct which places another person in danger of death or serious bodily injury.

Any person who knowingly points a firearm at or in the direction of another, whether or not the person believes the firearm is loaded, is guilty of reckless endangering unless reasonably necessary in defense of his person, property or abode or to prevent serious bodily injury to another or as provided for under W.S.

6-2-602

.

Reckless endangering is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2008, ch. 109, § 2.

Cross references. —

For definition of “recklessly,” see §

6-1-104

.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added “or as provided for under W.S.

6-2-602

” in (b).

Harm. —

The “harm” contemplated in the definition of “recklessly,” Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-1-104(a)(ix), in the context of the reckless endangerment statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-504(a), is not death or serious bodily injury, and neither death nor serious bodily injury must result before a person can be convicted of reckless endangerment; rather, the term “harm” in the definition of “recklessly” refers to engaging in conduct which places another person in danger of death or serious bodily injury. Orona-Rangal v. State, 2002 WY 134, 53 P.3d 1080,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2002), limited, Kite v. State, 2018 WY 94, 424 P.3d 255,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2018).

Actor's belief as to loaded or unloaded nature of gun irrelevant. —

Subsection (b) of this section means that, whenever an actor knowingly points a firearm at another, whether the firearm is loaded or not, he is guilty of reckless endangering, provided the firearm was not pointed for defensive purposes; the second clause of subsection (b) merely makes irrelevant the actor's belief as to the loaded or unloaded nature of the gun. In re Interests of ALJ, 836 P.2d 307,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1992).

Relationship to aggravated assault and battery. —

The offense of reckless endangering is not a lesser included offense of aggravated assault and battery as defined in §

6-2-502

because reckless endangering encompasses an additional element not included in the elements of aggravated assault and battery. Sindelar v. State, 932 P.2d 730,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1997).

Misdemeanor of reckless endangerment, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-504

, is not a lesser-included offense of aggravated assault and battery; the offense of reckless endangerment encompasses an additional element, that the act was done recklessly, which is not included in the elements of aggravated assault and battery. Miller v. State, 2003 WY 55, 67 P.3d 1191,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2003).

Sufficient evidence. —

Evidence was sufficient to find defendant guilty of reckless endangering because the State presented evidence that a teenager was holding a dog while defendant shot the dog and that he gave no warning before he fired; thus, the jury could conclude that defendant consciously disregarded a substantial risk that his conduct placed the teenager in danger of death or serious bodily injury and that his conduct was a gross deviation from the standard of conduct a reasonable person would observe. Mackley v. State, 2021 WY 33, 481 P.3d 639,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2021); .

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction under § 6-2-504(a) where there was ample evidence of defendant's excessive speed, disregard for traffic laws, and erratic driving that resulted in a collision of such force that the deceased's vehicle was propelled across the intersection and collided with a third vehicle, injuring both the passenger in defendant's own vehicle and the driver of the third vehicle; on these facts more than sufficient evidence existed to prove defendant placed his passenger and an unsuspecting third party in danger of death or serious bodily injury. Orona-Rangal v. State, 2002 WY 134, 53 P.3d 1080,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2002), limited, Kite v. State, 2018 WY 94, 424 P.3d 255,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2018).

Applied

in

Amin v. State, 694 P.2d 119,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 438

(Wyo. 1985); Lindsey v. State, 725 P.2d 649,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 611

(Wyo. 1986); Hodges v. State, 904 P.2d 334,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Olson v. State, 960 P.2d 1019,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1998); Abeyta v. State, 2002 WY 44, 42 P.3d 1009,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2002); Messer v. State, 2004 WY 98, 96 P.3d 12,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(2004); Sarr v. State, 2007 WY 140, 166 P.3d 891,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Aug. 29, 2007); Cohen v. State, 2008 WY 78,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(July 14, 2008).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

§ 6-2-505.
Terroristic threats; penalty.

A person is guilty of a terroristic threat if he threatens to commit any violent felony with the intent to cause evacuation of a building, place of assembly or facility of public transportation, or otherwise to cause serious public inconvenience, or in reckless disregard of the risk of causing such inconvenience.

A terroristic threat is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Constitutionally protected conduct not reached by section.—

A statute may be challenged “facially” for vagueness only if it reaches a substantial amount of constitutionally protected conduct. Subsection (a) of this section (terrorist threats) does not reach a substantial amount of constitutionally protected speech, such as “practical jokes and groundless threats.” Clearly, what the legislature intended to prohibit through subsection (a) of this section were violent threats which subject society to clear and present danger. McCone v. State, 866 P.2d 740,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. Feb. 2, 1994).

Threatening nursing home not constitutionally protected. —

This section was not unconstitutionally vague as it applied to the defendant's conduct. Although the phrase “serious public inconvenience” is not specifically defined, the statute provides an example — evacuation of a building, etc. In the case of the defendants charged conduct — an imminent bomb threat directed at a nursing home facility — a person of ordinary intelligence would have been aware that a serious public inconvenience, such as evacuation of the nursing home's elderly patients, could have occurred and therefore also understood that his or her conduct violated this section. McCone v. State, 866 P.2d 740,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. Feb. 2, 1994).

Threatening felony, risking evacuation, deemed terrorist threat.—

One who threatens to commit a violent felony in reckless disregard of the risk of causing evacuation of a building is guilty of a terroristic threat. McCone v. State, 866 P.2d 740,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. Feb. 2, 1994).

Prior harassment, threats, admissible to prove identity. —

In a prosecution for making terrorist threats over the telephone, the court did not err in admitting testimony by the victim alleging that the defendant continually harassed her for months before the phone calls in question, and in admitting a tape recording of the defendant allegedly threatening the victim over the phone several months prior to the present incident. The tape and the testimony were offered to prove identity, and identity was a material issue at trial. McCone v. State, 866 P.2d 740,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. Feb. 2, 1994).

Testimony on impact of threats relevant. —

In a prosecution for terrorist threats to a nursing home, the court neither abused its discretion nor violated a clear rule of law when it admitted testimony concerning the impact of the threatening phone calls on the individuals at home. This testimony was relevant because it was probative of the risk of serious public inconvenience, and was not unduly prejudicial. McCone v. State, 866 P.2d 740,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. Feb. 2, 1994).

Testimony that recipient of terroristic threat purchased a pistol and began practicing with it was properly admitted, as it demonstrated that defendant's threats were perceived as serious. Ellison v. State, 3 P.3d 845,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2000).

Threatening telephone calls not lesser-included crime. —

Section

6-6-103

(threatening telephone calls) is not a lesser-included crime of this section (terrorist threats). For example, if the state proves that a person threatened a violent felony in reckless disregard of the risk of causing an evacuation, they have proved the elements of this section but not the elements of §

6-6-103

, because there is no proof that the threat was telephoned. Therefore, the elements of § 6-6-103 are not identical to, nor a subset of, the elements of this section, and § 6-6-103 is not a lesser-included crime. McCone v. State, 866 P.2d 740,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. Feb. 2, 1994).

Jury instructions. —

Instruction which directed jury to consider inconvenience caused by summoning of police and fire agencies did not create a mandatory presumption that summoning of such agencies constituted a “serious public inconvenience”; moreover, state was not required to prove that a serious public inconvenience occurred, but only that defendant made his threats with intent to cause or in reckless disregard of causing one. Ellison v. State, 3 P.3d 845,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of terroristic threat statutes, 45 ALR4th 949.

Imposition of state or local penalties for threatening to use explosive devices at schools or other buildings, 79 ALR5th 1.

Validity, construction, and application of 18 U.S.C. § 844(e), prohibiting use of mail, telephone, telegraph, or other instrument of commerce to convey bomb threat, 160 ALR Fed 625.

§ 6-2-506.
Stalking; penalty.

As used in this section:

“Course of conduct” means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of acts over any period of time evidencing a continuity of purpose;

“Harass” means to engage in a course of conduct, including but not limited to verbal threats, written threats, lewd or obscene statements or images, vandalism or nonconsensual physical contact, directed at a specific person that the defendant knew or should have known would cause:

A reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress;

A reasonable person to suffer substantial fear for their safety or the safety of another person; or

A reasonable person to suffer substantial fear for the destruction of their property.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a person commits the crime of stalking if, with intent to harass another person, the person engages in a course of conduct reasonably likely to harass that person, including but not limited to any combination of the following:

Communicating, anonymously or otherwise, or causing a communication with another person by verbal, electronic, mechanical, telegraphic, telephonic or written means in a manner that harasses;

Following a person, other than within the residence of the defendant;

Placing a person under surveillance by remaining present outside his or her school, place of employment, vehicle, other place occupied by the person, or residence other than the residence of the defendant;

Using any electronic, digital or global positioning system device or other electronic means to place another person under surveillance or to surveil another person’s internet or wireless activity without authorization from the other person; or

Otherwise engaging in a course of conduct that harasses another person.

This section does not apply to an otherwise lawful demonstration, assembly or picketing.

Except as provided under subsection (e) of this section, stalking is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. If a person sentenced under this subsection is placed on probation, the court may, notwithstanding any other provision of law, impose a term of probation exceeding the maximum one (1) year imprisonment, provided the term of probation, including extensions, shall not exceed three (3) years.

A person convicted of stalking under subsection (b) of this section is guilty of felony stalking punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, if:

The act or acts leading to the conviction occurred within five (5) years of the completion of the sentence, including all periods of incarceration, parole and probation, of a prior conviction under this subsection, or under subsection (b) of this section, or under a substantially similar law of another jurisdiction;

The defendant caused serious bodily harm to the victim or another person in conjunction with committing the offense of stalking;

The defendant committed the offense of stalking in violation of any condition of probation, parole or bail; or

The defendant committed the offense of stalking in violation of a temporary or permanent order of protection issued pursuant to W.S.

7-3-508

,

7-3-509

,

35-21-104

or

35-21-105

or pursuant to a substantially similar law of another jurisdiction.

An offense under this section may be deemed to have been committed at the place where any:

Act within the course of conduct that constitutes stalking was initiated; or

Communication within the course of conduct that constitutes stalking was received by the victim then present in Wyoming; or

Act within the course of conduct that constitutes stalking caused an effect on the victim then present in Wyoming.

An act that indicates a course of conduct but occurs in more than one (1) jurisdiction may be used by any jurisdiction in which the act occurred as evidence of a continuing course of conduct.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 92, § 1; 2007, ch. 161, § 1; 2018 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 97, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2022 ch. 98, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “lewd or obscene statements or images” in (a)(ii).

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(ii), substituted “person that the defendant” for “person or the family of a specific person, which the defendant” and redesignated former ending text as (a)(ii)(A); in (a)(ii)(A), deleted “and which does in fact seriously alarm the person toward whom it is directed” at the end; added (a)(ii)(B) and (C); in (d), substituted “more than one (1) year, a” for “more than six (6) months, a” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; in (e)(i), inserted “of the completion of the sentence, including all periods of incarceration, parole and probation” following “five (5) years”; in (e)(iv), inserted “35-21-104 or

35-21-105

” following “7-3-509”; added (f) and (g); and made stylistic changes.

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 97, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (e)(iv), substituted “W.S.

7-3-508

,

7-3-509

,

35-21-104

or

35-21-105

” for “W.S.

7-3-508

or

7-3-509

.” While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “or” at the end of (b)(iii); added (b)(iv); and redesignated former (b)(iv) as (b)(v).

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 97, § 3, provides: "This act shall apply to crimes committed and orders of protection issued on or after the effective date of this act."

Factual basis for guilty plea existed. —

District court did not violate a clear and unequivocal rule of law when it accepted defendant’s guilty plea to stalking and strangulation of a household member because there was a sufficient factual basis for the plea where defendant testified he placed his hand on the victim’s neck or throat to stop her from yelling and screaming and believed his action impeded her breathing or blood flow. Beeson v. State, 2022 WY 86, 512 P.3d 986,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2022).

Statute is constitutional. —

Statute is constitutional on its face; the fact that the statute identifies “lewd or obscene statements” in the definition of harass does not make it a content-based regulation on speech rather than a regulation of conduct without a significant impact on protected speech.
Dugan v. State, 2019 WY 112, 451 P.3d 731,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2019), cert. denied, 140 S. Ct. 1298, 206 L. Ed. 2d 377, 2020 U.S. LEXIS 1610 (U.S. 2020).

Statute bears all the hallmarks of a statute that criminalizes conduct without reaching a substantial amount of protected speech; it requires proof that the defendant acted with the specific intent to harass the victim, and subsections (a)(ii) and (b) incorporate the concept of repeated communications to the victim by requiring the State to prove the defendant engaged in a “course of conduct.”Dugan v. State, 2019 WY 112.

District court’s refusal to require proof that defendant’s statements met the definition of “obscene” under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-4-301

did not render
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-506

unconstitutional as applied to him; the punishment of obscenity under laws that regulate pure speech is much different than the punishment of harassing conduct which includes obscene statements.
Dugan v. State, 2019 WY 112, 451 P.3d 731,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2019), cert. denied, 140 S. Ct. 1298, 206 L. Ed. 2d 377, 2020 U.S. LEXIS 1610 (U.S. 2020).

District court correctly rejected defendant’s proposed instruction because it did not state a proper defense to the stalking charge; defendant’s proposed instruction stated the State had to prove his speech fell within one of the listed categories of unprotected speech to convict him of criminal stalking, but the statute complied with the First Amendment because it punished conduct, not a substantial amount of protected speech.
Dugan v. State, 2019 WY 112, 451 P.3d 731,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2019), cert. denied, 140 S. Ct. 1298, 206 L. Ed. 2d 377, 2020 U.S. LEXIS 1610 (U.S. 2020).

The statute does satisfy the requirement that there be a standard of conduct; the definition in paragraph (a)(i) is an appropriately clear statement of what constitutes a course of conduct. Luplow v. State, 897 P.2d 463,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1995).

Subsection (c) of this section, which excludes “otherwise lawful demonstration, assembly or picketing,” substantially disposes of any contention that the statute affects constitutionally protected conduct. Luplow v. State, 897 P.2d 463,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1995).

Sufficient specificity exists defining the conduct proscribed to meet the test of vagueness. Luplow v. State, 897 P.2d 463,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1995).

The Wyoming stalking statute is not void for vagueness, nor is it subject to constitutional attack as being overbroad. Luplow v. State, 897 P.2d 463,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1995).

The specific provision making stalking a felony if committed in violation of any condition of probation, parole, or bail is not unconstitutionally vague and does not violate the defendant's right to equal protection. Garton v. State, 910 P.2d 1348,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1996).

Due process. —

Defendant who was convicted of stalking based on a protective order issued while defendant was in a locked psychiatric ward was not afforded due process because defendant did not have a meaningful opportunity to be heard. Joyner v. State, 2002 WY 174, 58 P.3d 331,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2002).

Sentence Not Illegal. —

District court properly denied defendant's motions to correct an illegal sentence because there was no increase in punishment and no violation of his double jeopardy protections; all of the fees imposed upon defendant's conviction were mandated by statute, and thus, it was unnecessary for the district court to attach the fees to the stalking charge in the initial sentence.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Evidence held sufficient. —

Evidence was sufficient to sustain the stalking conviction under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-506

(2018 Supp.) where a rational trier of fact could have inferred from the menacing content of the text messages that defendant intended to cause the victim substantial emotional distress and substantial fear. Bittleston v. State, 2019 WY 64, 442 P.3d 1287,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2019).

“Course of conduct”. —

“Course of
conduct” necessary for a felony stalking conviction under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-506(e)(iii) or (iv) may encompass acts of harassment occurring prior
to the issuance of an order proscribing contact with the victim. The
State is not required to demonstrate violations of multiple protection
orders in order to establish the course of conduct.
Walker v. State, 2013 WY 58, 302 P.3d 182,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2013).

Evidence was insufficient to demonstrate that defendant engaged in a course of conduct necessary to support a stalking conviction under this section because no intent to harass was shown by defendant's act of watching the victim during a chance encounter in a small town. Hawes v. State, 2014 WY 127, 335 P.3d 1073,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2014), cert. denied, 576 U.S. 1025, 135 S. Ct. 2846, 192 L. Ed. 2d 882, 2015 U.S. LEXIS 3929 (U.S. 2015).

Conditional probation. —

One year delay in imposing a sentence for felony stalking of a year's probation conditioned on defendant's staying away from the victim was unreasonable, where he had complied with this same condition for the year prior to sentencing. Detheridge v. State, 963 P.2d 233,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1998).

Relation to violation of protection order. —

Crime of violating a protection order as defined by
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-4-404

is not a lesser-included offense of the crime of stalking as defined by
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-506(b) because the elements of the former simply are not a subset of the elements of the latter.
Snow v. State, 2009 WY 117, 216 P.3d 505,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2009).

Jury instructions. —

Defendant's conviction for felony stalking of his ex-wife was improper because while defendant had been charged under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-506(b) with engaging in a course of conduct of harassment, the trial court gave the jury conflicting instructions as to the State's burden of proof in regard to that course of conduct.
Walker v. State, 2012 WY 1, 267 P.3d 1107,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2012).

Defendant
did not establish that plain error occurred in the jury instruction
because the district court's failure to instruct on the examples
of
course of conduct element of the crime of stalking enumerated
in the
statute did not transgress a clear and unequivocal rule of
law. Dean v. State, 2014 WY 158, 339 P.3d 509,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2014).

Quoted

in

Veile v. Martinson, 258 F.3d 1180, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 17097 (10th Cir. 2001).

Stated

in

GWJ v. MH, 930 P.2d 371,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1996); Law v. State, 2004 WY 111, 98 P.3d 181,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(2004); Salinas v. State, 2016 WY 97, 380 P.3d 647,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2016).

Cited

in

Basolo v. Basolo, 907 P.2d 348,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1995); Vit v. State, 909 P.2d 953,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1996); Hoblyn v. Johnson, 2002 WY 152, 55 P.3d 1219,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2002); Gibbs v. State, 2008 WY 79, 187 P.3d 862,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(July 14, 2008).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

For comment, “Utilizing the Tools: Successfully Implementing the Stalking Statutes,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 521 (2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of stalking statutes, 29 ALR5th 487.